Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.170

Immunization program—Department of social and health services' rules, contents.

The department of social and health services shall and is hereby empowered to adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW which establish the procedural and substantive due process requirements governing the exclusion of children from day care centers pursuant to RCW 28A.210.120.

[ 1990 c 33 s 200; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.31.120.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: See notes following RCW 28A.210.060.